Washington statutes.
RCW 26.18.030

Application—Liberal construction.

(1) The remedies provided in this chapter are in addition to, and not in substitution for, any other remedies provided by law.

(2) This chapter applies to any dependent child, whether born before or after June 7, 1984, and regardless of the past or current marital status or domestic partnership status of the parents, and to a spouse or former spouse or domestic partner or former domestic partner.

(3) This chapter shall be liberally construed to assure that all dependent children are adequately supported.

[ 2008 c 6 s 1028; 1993 c 426 s 3; 1984 c 260 s 3.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.